Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 21 Health and Safety of Pupils
16-21-33.
Safe schools act.

Definitions. As used in this chapter:

“Bullying” means the use by one or more students of a written, verbal or electronic expression or a physical act or gesture or any combination thereof directed at a student that:

Causes physical or emotional harm to the student or damage to the student’s property;

Places the student in reasonable fear of harm to himself/herself or of damage to his/her property;

Creates an intimidating, threatening, hostile, or abusive educational environment for the student;

Infringes on the rights of the student to participate in school activities; or

Materially and substantially disrupts the education process or the orderly operation of a school. The expression, physical act or gesture may include, but is not limited to, an incident or incidents that may be reasonably perceived as being motivated by characteristics such as race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression or mental, physical, or sensory disability, intellectual ability or by any other distinguishing characteristic.

“Cyber-bullying” means bullying through the use of technology or any electronic communication, which shall include, but shall not be limited to, any transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, data, texting or intelligence of any nature transmitted in whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photo electronic or photo optical system, including, but not limited to, electronic mail, Internet communications, instant messages or facsimile communications. For purposes of this section, cyber-bullying shall also include:

The creation of a web page or blog in which the creator assumes the identity of another person;

The knowing impersonation of another person as the author of posted content or messages; or

The distribution by electronic means of a communication to more than one person or the posting of materials on an electronic medium that may be accessed by one or more persons, if the creation, impersonation, or distribution results in any of the conditions enumerated in clauses (i) to (v) of the definition of bullying herein.

“At school” means on school premises, at any school-sponsored activity or event whether or not it is held on school premises, on a school-transportation vehicle, at an official school bus stop, using property or equipment provided by the school, or creates a material and substantial disruption of the education process or the orderly operation of the school.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 162, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 178, § 3.

16-21-33.1.
Automatic external defibrillators.

Legislative findings:

Approximately three hundred twenty-five thousand (325,000) Americans suffer sudden cardiac arrest (“SCA”) each year and more than ninety-five percent (95%) of them die before reaching the hospital;

In the population of Rhode Island, an estimated one thousand (1,000) residents will die of cardiac arrest every year;

No official statistics have been gathered about SCA in children, however experts estimate about three hundred (300) deaths because of SCA every year for people under the age of twenty-one (21) or about one tenth of one percent (.001%);

This means that at least one person under the age of twenty-one (21) years, most likely a student, will die due to athletics related SCA every year in Rhode Island;

If defibrillation is performed within five (5) to seven (7) minutes, chances of survival are increased by forty-nine percent (49%). Every minute that goes by without defibrillation reduces the chance of survival by seven percent (7%) to ten percent (10%);

Automated external defibrillators (AEDs) are extremely accurate computerized devices that can be operated by the average person;

AEDs are inexpensive and grants for AEDs are mostly given to nonprofit organizations, such as schools; and

AEDs can be acquired through grants from various organizations or through government agencies.

All high schools and middle schools, whether they are public or privately run, shall provide and maintain on-site functional automated external defibrillators (AEDs) in quantities and types, deemed by the commissioner of education, in consultation with the director of health, to be adequate to ensure ready and appropriate access for use during emergencies. Whenever school facilities are used for school-sponsored or school-approved curricular or extracurricular activities, and whenever a school-sponsored athletic contest is held at any location, the school officials and administrators responsible for such school facility or athletic contest shall ensure the presence of at least one person who is properly trained in the operation and use of an AED. Such training may be conducted by qualified personnel, including, but not limited to, municipal fire and police department employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 357, § 1.

16-21-34.
Statewide bullying policy implemented.

The Rhode Island department of education shall prescribe by regulation a statewide bullying policy, ensuring a consistent and unified, statewide approach to the prohibition of bullying at school. The statewide policy shall apply to all schools that are approved for the purpose of §

16-9-1

and shall contain the following:

Descriptions of and statements prohibiting bullying, cyber-bullying and retaliation of school;

Clear requirements and procedures for students, staff, parents, guardians and others to report bullying or retaliation;

A provision that reports of bullying or retaliation may be made anonymously; provided, however, that no disciplinary action shall be taken against a student solely on the basis of an anonymous report;

Clear procedures for promptly responding to and investigating reports of bullying or retaliation;

The range of disciplinary actions that may be taken against a perpetrator for bullying or retaliation; provided, however, that the disciplinary actions shall balance the need for accountability with the need to teach appropriate behavior; and provided, further:

A parental engagement strategy; and

A provision that states punishments for violations of the bullying policy shall be determined by the school’s appropriate authority; however, no student shall be suspended from school unless it is deemed a necessary consequence of the violations;

Clear procedures for restoring a sense of safety for a victim and assessing that victim’s needs for protection;

Strategies for protecting from bullying or retaliation a person who reports bullying, provides information during an investigation of bullying or witnesses or has reliable information about an act of bullying;

Procedures for promptly notifying the parents or guardians of a victim and a perpetrator; provided, further, that the parents or guardians of a victim shall also be notified of the action taken to prevent any further acts of bullying or retaliation; and provided, further, that the procedures shall provide for immediate notification of the local law enforcement agency when criminal charges may be pursued against the perpetrator;

A provision that a student who knowingly makes a false accusation of bullying or retaliation shall be subject to disciplinary action;

A strategy for providing counseling or referral to appropriate services currently being offered by schools or communities for perpetrators and victims and for appropriate family members of said students. The plan shall afford all students the same protection regardless of their status under the law;

A provision that requires a principal or designee to be responsible for the implementation and oversight of the bullying policy;

Provisions for informing parents and guardians about the bullying policy of the school district or school shall include, but not be limited to:

A link to the policy prominently posted on the home page of the school district’s website and distributed annually to parents and guardians of students;

A provision for notification, within twenty-four (24) hours, of the incident report, to the parents or guardians of the victim of bullying and parents or guardians of the alleged perpetrator of the bullying;

A school employee, school volunteer, student, parent, legal guardian, or relative caregiver who promptly reports, in good faith, an act of bullying to the appropriate school official designated in the school’s policy is immune from a cause of action for damages arising from reporting bullying;

This section does not prevent a victim from seeking redress under any other available law, either civil or criminal. This section does not create or alter any tort liability;

Students shall be prohibited from accessing social networking sites at school, except for educational or instructional purposes and with the prior approval from school administration. Nothing in this act shall prohibit students from using school department or school websites for educational purposes. School districts and schools are encouraged to provide in-service training on Internet safety for students, faculty and staff; and

All school districts, charter schools, career and technical schools, approved private day or residential schools and collaborative schools shall be subject to the requirements of this section. School districts and schools must adopt the statewide bullying policy promulgated pursuant to this section by June 30, 2012.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 162, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 178, § 3.

16-21-35.
Opioid-related drug overdose — Use of opioid antagonists — Immunity for those administering.

For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Opioid antagonist” means any drug that binds to opioid receptors and blocks or disinhibits the effects of opioids acting on those receptors, including naloxone hydrochloride, also known as Narcan or naloxone.

“Opioid-related drug overdose” means a condition including, but not limited to, extreme physical illness, decreased level of consciousness, respiratory depression, coma, or death resulting from the consumption or use of an opioid or another substance with which an opioid was combined, or that a layperson would reasonably believe to be an opioid-related drug overdose that requires medical assistance.

“School setting” means circumstances occurring while at school or at school-sponsored events or activities.

All public and private elementary, middle schools, junior high schools, and high schools, shall provide and maintain on-site in each school facility opioid antagonists, as defined herein.

To treat a case of suspected opioid overdose in a school setting, any trained nurse-teacher may administer an opioid antagonist, during an emergency, to any student or staff suspected of having an opioid-related drug overdose whether or not there is a previous history of opioid abuse. School physicians shall prepare standing orders for the procedures to be followed in dealing with a suspected opioid overdose in a school setting. The standing orders shall not require any school nurse-teacher to administer an opioid antagonist.

Opioid antagonists shall be maintained in quantities and types deemed adequate by the department of elementary and secondary education and the department of health, which shall incorporate into their policies, rules, and regulations a procedure for addressing incidents of opioid-related drug overdose in order to provide for the health and safety of children. Any policy, rule, or regulation shall ensure that the opioid antagonist is kept in a conspicuous place, readily available, but with provisions made for the safekeeping and security of the opioid antagonist so that the security of the medication will not be compromised.

Any school nurse-teacher or other school personnel using an opioid antagonist shall be protected from both civil and criminal liability pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28.9 of title 21 (the good samaritan overdose prevention act of 2016).

No school nurse-teacher shall be subject to penalty or disciplinary action for refusing to be trained in the administration of an opioid antagonist.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 238, § 1.

16-21-36.
Duty to report — Posting child abuse hotline telephone number.

Each public or private school in the state shall post a notice that contains the statewide, toll-free telephone number, established and implemented by the department of children, youth and families pursuant to §

40-11-3

for the receipt of reports concerning the suspicion of child abuse and neglect or that a child has been a victim of sexual abuse by another child, in a conspicuous, high-traffic area accessed and widely used by the students in each school.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 465, § 1.

16-21-37.
Water bottle filling stations in new and renovated schools.

The state of Rhode Island finds and declares that:

Water plays an important role in maintaining a child’s overall health;

Drinking water can positively impact children’s cognitive performance;

Drinking water can improve children’s fine motor skills and visual attention, which helps with learning activities, such as reading;

Drinking water can help people maintain a healthier weight.

The purpose of this policy is to ensure that all newly constructed schools and those schools undergoing major building renovations incorporate adequate water bottle filling stations to increase access to free, easily accessible, safe, and good-tasting drinking water on school property.

Major renovations shall mean renovations with a total estimated cost of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more, or involving the substantial repair, replacement, or upgrading of the plumbing system or plumbing fixtures.

All newly constructed public school buildings and public school buildings undergoing major renovations, such as additions, within the state of Rhode Island shall be equipped with water bottle filling stations consistent with the requirements of this policy.

The school committees of each city or town and/or the governing authority overseeing school policies or construction shall not approve the plans or specifications for a new public school building, any addition, or major renovations of an existing public school building unless the plans and specifications provide for the following:

A minimum of one water bottle filling station per one hundred (100) people projected to occupy the building upon completion of the proposed construction;

A minimum of one water bottle filling station on each floor and on each wing of each school building;

A minimum of one water bottle filling station located in or near gymnasiums, cafeterias, and other high-traffic areas;

Water bottle filling stations may be integrated into drinking fountains; and

Schools are encouraged to install touchless water bottle filling stations for sanitary reasons.

A water bottle filling station installed in a public school building must:

Dispense clean, cooled, filtered drinking water;

Be regularly cleaned to maintain sanitary conditions; and

Be maintained on a regular basis to ensure it functions properly.

Students, teachers, and staff shall be allowed to bring and carry approved water bottles under the following conditions:

Water bottles shall be made of material that is not easily breakable;

Water bottles shall have a lid to prevent spills;

Water bottles shall be used exclusively for water and no other beverage;

Water bottles shall be allowed in classrooms, but may be excluded from libraries, computer labs, science labs, and other places where it is deemed dangerous to have drinking water;

Misuse of water bottles may be subject to disciplinary action.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 115, § 1, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 116, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

16-21-38.
Availability of feminine hygiene products.

By the beginning of the 2022-2023 school year, all public schools maintaining any combination of classes from grade five (5) through grade twelve (12), inclusive, shall make feminine hygiene products available in the school as follows:

Feminine products shall be available in all gender-neutral bathrooms and any bathroom designated for females;

Feminine products shall be available at no cost to students.

For the purposes of this section, “feminine hygiene products” includes tampons and sanitary napkins.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 155, § 1, effective July 2, 2021.

16-21-39.
Sun safety.

Any person including, but not limited to, students, parents, or school personnel may possess and use a topical sunscreen product, without a physician’s note or prescription, while on school property or at a school-related event, or activity, to avoid overexposure to the sun, if the product is regulated by the Federal Food and Drug Administration for over-the-counter use. Notwithstanding the foregoing, children enrolled in grades kindergarten through five (K-5) may only possess sunscreen on school property or at a school-related event or activity with a note from a parent or guardian.

For the purposes of this section only, sunscreen is not to be considered an over-the-counter medication.

Nothing in this section requires school personnel to assist pupils in applying sunscreen. Nothing in this section shall make the school district or its personnel liable for any damages.

The school district may encourage schools to educate pupils on sun safety precautions.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 311, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 312, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

16-21-40.
Trauma-informed schools act.

Schools play a critical role in addressing and mitigating the effects of child trauma by recognizing the impact of adversity and trauma on students, parents, and staff, and embedding policies and practices that foster well-being and resilience.

Through alignment and integration with a multi-tiered system of support frameworks designed to support the academic, behavioral, social, and emotional needs of all students, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall develop a trauma-informed schools implementation plan, as well as necessary administrative guidance, professional development materials, and other resources to enable all elementary and secondary schools to:

Establish and implement trauma-informed practices within all elementary and secondary education schools throughout the state, that:

Promote a shared understanding among teachers, teacher’s assistants, school leaders, paraprofessionals, specialized instructional support personnel, and other staff that:

Traumatic experiences are common among students;

Trauma can impact student learning, behavior, and relationships in school;

Traumatic experiences do not inherently undermine the capabilities of students to reach high expectations in academics and life;

Schoolwide learning environments, where all students and adults feel safe, welcomed, and supported, can enable students to succeed despite traumatic experiences; and

Services, supports, and programs provided to meet individual student needs should be trauma-informed, where appropriate, and increase student connection to the schoolwide learning environment.

Adopt disciplinary procedures and practices that:

Accompany disciplinary actions with holistic assessments and positive behavioral interventions and supports to address the underlying causes of student behavior, including trauma;

Avoid harsh, punitive, or exclusionary disciplinary practices;

Utilize evidence-based restorative practices with a focus on behavior modifications and building community, and less punitive or exclusionary practices that erode a culture of trust;

Implement procedures to call skilled mental health personnel when there is a mental health breakdown, and resort to law enforcement only in extreme cases and/or when a student or students are at risk of bodily harm; and

Do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, sex (including sexual orientation or gender identity), disability, English proficiency status, migrant status, or age.

Implement activities that engage teachers, teacher’s assistants, school leaders, paraprofessionals, specialized instructional support personnel, and other staff, in a process of school-based planning to:

Promote a schoolwide culture of acceptance;

Help all students feel safe and connected to the school community;

Support all students to form positive relationships with adults and peers, understand and manage emotions, achieve success academically and in extracurricular areas, and experience physical and psychological health and well-being;

Promote teamwork and effective communication among all staff and shared responsibility for every student;

Integrate evidence-based practices that build social-emotional skills into rigorous academic instruction;

Support trauma-sensitive and informed approaches to multi-tiered system of supports (“MTSS”) function of team-based leadership, tiered delivery system, selection and implementation of instruction and intervention, comprehensive screening and assessment system, and continuous data-based decision-making; and

Recognize and prevent adult implicit bias.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 396, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 397, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.

16-21-41.
Trauma-informed schools act commission.

There is hereby established a trauma-informed schools commission (hereinafter the “commission”). The commission shall meet at least quarterly or approximately four (4) times per year in fiscal years 2023 and 2024. It shall expire on June 30, 2024. Members of the commission shall serve without compensation.

The commission shall be appointed by the council on elementary and secondary education no later than September 30, 2022, and shall be comprised of twelve (12) members: one of whom shall be the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, or designee; one of whom shall be a representative of the RI school superintendents association; one of whom shall be appointed from among the leadership of the state’s teachers’ unions; one of whom shall be the child advocate; one of whom shall be a representative of a Rhode Island-based institution of higher education with expertise in child development, child mental and behavioral health, trauma-informed educational practices, or a related field; two (2) of whom shall be representatives of youth-serving community-based organizations that provide direct services to youth who have experienced, or are at high risk of experiencing trauma; one of whom shall be a licensed clinical social worker, who primarily works with youth and/or families; one of whom shall be a representative of the Rhode Island Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics; one of whom shall be the executive director of RI Kids Count, or designee; one of whom shall be the president of Adoption RI, or designee; and one of whom shall be a representative of an organization that engages and/or supports parents of school-age children, with priority given to representation from a parent-led organization.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide necessary staff and material support to the commission in the furtherance of its purpose.

The purpose of the commission shall be to assist the department of elementary and secondary education with the implementation of the trauma-informed schools act, as set forth in this section and §

16-21-40

.

In furtherance of its purpose, the commission shall undertake such actions as it determines appropriate, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Conducting a review and assessment of existing trauma-informed school and community-based resources and initiatives across the state;

Informing the development of a trauma-informed school implementation plan and supporting materials, that shall be submitted to the council on elementary and secondary education for approval no later than April 1, 2024;

Researching, identifying, and cataloging state, federal, and philanthropic funding sources that align with the provisions of this section and §

16-21-40

;

No later than March 1, 2023, submitting an interim report to the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, and the governor, that provides an update on the commission’s initial findings, work plan, and any preliminary recommendations for regulatory or legislative action to promote the implementation of trauma-informed practices in schools; and

No later than June 30, 2024, submitting a final report to the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, and the governor, that details the commission’s findings and recommendations for implementing trauma-informed practices in every elementary and secondary school in Rhode Island.

The commission shall elect a chairperson from its membership. A quorum of the commission at any meeting shall consist of at least seven (7) members.

All departments, boards, and agencies of the state shall cooperate with the commission and forthwith furnish any advice and information, documentary and otherwise, as may be necessary or desirable to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

The department of education is authorized and directed to provide suitable quarters for commission meetings.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 396, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 397, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.